Arkansas, session 2025, HB1732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-459(c), concerning the income tax
deduction for teachers' classroom investment, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The deduction allowed under subsection (b) of this section shall
not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
taxpayer or one two thousand dollars ($1,000) ($2,000) for taxpayers who are
married filing jointly if each taxpayer is a teacher.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/Vaught

*JLL139*
03-18-2025 10:38:07 JLL139